en: From 15 months
ca: Des dels 15 mesos
de: Ab 15 Monaten, Ab 15. Monat, Ab dem 15. Monat
es: De 15 meses, A partir de 15 meses
fr: Dès 15 mois
hr: Od 15 mjeseci
hu: 15 hónapos kortól
it: Dal 15mo mese, Dal quindicesimo mese, A partire dal quindicesimo mese, A partire dal 15mo mese
lt: Nuo 15 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 15 maanden, Vanaf 15 maand
pt: A partir dos 15 meses

en: From 18 months
ca: Des dels 18 mesos
de: Ab 18 Monaten, Ab 18. Monat, Ab dem 18. Monat
es: De 18 meses, A partir de 18 meses
fr: Dès 18 mois
hr: Od 18 mjeseci
hu: 18 hónapos kortól, Egy és fél éves kortól, Másfél éves kortól
it: Dal 18mo mese, Dal diciottesimo mese, A partire dal diciottesimo mese, A partire dal 18mo mese
lt: Nuo 18 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 18 maanden, Vanaf 18 maand
pt: A partir dos 18 meses

en: From 24 months
ca: Des dels 24 mesos
de: Ab 24 Monaten, Ab 24. Monat, Ab dem 24. Monat, Ab 2 Jahren
es: De 24 meses, A partir de 24 meses
fr: Dès 24 mois
hr: Od 24 mjeseca
hu: 24 hónapos kortól, 2 éves kortól, Két éves kortól
it: Dal 24mo mese, Dal ventiquattresimo mese, A partire dal ventiquattresimo mese, A partire dal 24mo mese, A partire dal secondo anno, Dal secondo anno
lt: Nuo 24 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 24 maanden, Vanaf 24 maand
pt: A partir de 24 meses

en: From 3 years
ca: Des dels 3 anys
de: Ab 3 Jahren
es: De 3 años, A partir de 3 años
hr: Od 3 godine
hu: 3 éves kortól
it: Dal terzo anno, Da tre anni, Da 3 anni
lt: Nuo 3 metų
nl: Vanaf 3 jaar
pt: A partir de 3 anos
ru: С 3-х лет, С 3 лет, С трёх лет

en: Snacks and desserts for babies
bg: Снаксове и десерти за бебета
ca: Snacks i postres per a nadons
de: Snacks und Desserts für Babies
es: Snacks y postres para bebes
fi: Naposteltavia ja jälkiruokia vauvoille
fr: Goûters et desserts pour bébé, Goûters pour bébé, Desserts pour bébé
hr: Grickalice i slastice za bebe
hu: Snackek és desszertek csecsemőknek
it: Snack e dolci per neonati
lt: Kūdikių užkandžiai ir desertai
nl: Snacks en toetjes voor babies
pt: Lanches e sobremesas para bebês
ro: Snack-uri și deserturi bebeluși, Snack-uri și deserturi pentru bebeluși

en: Biscuits for babies, Biscuit for baby, Baby biscuit
ca: Galetes per a nadons
de: Babykekse, Kekse für Babies
es: Galletas para bebes
fr: Biscuits pour bébé, Biscuit pour bébé
hr: Keksi za bebe
hu: Babakekszek, Baba kekszek, Kekszek csecsemőknek, Csecsemő kekszek
it: Biscotti per neonati
lt: Sausainiai kūdikiams
nl: Babykoekjes, Koekjes voor babies
pt: Biscoitos para bebês, biscoitos para bebês
ro: Biscuiți pentru bebeluși, Biscuiți bebeluși

en: Cocoa powder for baby beverage
fr: Poudre cacaotée pour bébé
pt: Cacau em pó para bebida de bebê

en: Baby drinks
ca: Begudes per a nadons
de: Getränke für Babies
es: Bebidas para bebes
fr: Boissons pour bébé, boisson pour bébé
hr: Dječja pića
hu: Bébiitalok, Babaitalok, Baba ital
it: Bevande per neonati
lt: Kūdikių gėrimai
nl: Babydranken, Babydrank
pt: Bebidas para bebês
ro: Băuturi pentru bebeluși, Băuturi bebeluși

en: Specialised baby drinks
pt: Bebidas especializadas para bebês

en: Plant-based beverages for babies, Plant-based beverage for baby
fr: Boisson à base de plantes pour bébé
hr: Biljni napitak za bebe
hu: Növényi alapú bébiitalok
lt: Augaliniai gėrimai kūdikiams
nl: Dranken voor babies gebaseerd op planten
pt: Bebida vegetal para bebê

en: Milky cereal-based beverages, Milky cereal-based beverage
fr: Boissons infantile lactée aux céréales, Boisson infantile lactée aux céréales
hu: Tejes gabonaalapú bébiitalok
pt: Bebidas lácteas à base de cereais, bebidas lácteas à base de cereais

en: Dairy cereal-based beverage for baby's breakfast
fr: Boisson lactée pour petit-déjeuner bébé avec céréales
pt: Bebida láctea à base de cereais para o café da manhã do bebê

en: Dairy cereal-based beverage with fruits for baby's snack from 4/6 months
fr: Boisson lactée pour goûter bébé dès 4/6 mois avec céréales et fruits
pt: Bebida láctea à base de cereais com frutas para o lanche do bebé a partir dos 4/6 meses

en: Dairy cereal-based beverage with vegetables for baby's dinner from 4/6 months
fr: Boisson lactée pour dîner bébé dès 4/6 mois avec céréales et légumes
pt: Bebida láctea à base de cereais com vegetais para o jantar do bebé a partir dos 4/6 meses

en: Dairy cereal-based beverage for baby's breakfast from 4/6 months
fr: Boisson lactée pour petit-déjeuner bébé dès 4/6 mois avec céréales
pt: Bebida láctea à base de cereais para o pequeno-almoço do bebé a partir dos 4/6 meses

en: Fruit-based beverages for babies from 4 months, Fruit-based beverages for baby from 4/6 months
fr: Boissons aux fruits pour bébé dès 4/6 mois
pt: Bebidas à base de fruta para bebé a partir dos 4/6 meses

en: Dairy cereal-based beverage for baby's breakfast from 8/9 months
fr: Boisson lactée pour petit-déjeuner bébé dès 8/9 mois avec céréales
pt: Bebida láctea à base de cereais para o pequeno-almoço do bebé a partir dos 8/9 meses

en: Dairy cereal-based beverage for baby's breakfast from 12 months
fr: Boisson lactée pour petit-déjeuner bébé dès 12 mois avec céréales
pt: Bebida láctea à base de cereais para o pequeno-almoço do bebé a partir dos 12 meses

en: Baby/Infant Foods/Beverages Variety Packs
de: Baby- / Kleinkindernahrungmischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de alimentos para niños/bebés
fr: Bébés/Nourrissons - assortiments de nourriture
hr: Različita pakiranja hrane/hrane za dojenčad/pića
hu: Bébi/csecsemő étel/ital válogatás
it: Confezioni miste d'alimenti bambini
nl: Baby/Peuter levensmiddelassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de alimentos para infantil

en: Baby fruit desserts, Fruit desserts for babies
ca: Postres de fruita per a nadons
de: Fruchtdesserts für Babies
es: Postres de frutas para bebe, Postres de frutas para bebes
fi: Hedelmäjälkiruoat vauvoille
fr: Desserts au fruit pour bébé
hr: Dječji voćni deserti
hu: Bébi gyümölcsdesszertek, Baba gyümölcsdesszertek, Gyümölcsdesszertek babáknak
it: Dessert alla frutta per neonati
lt: Vaisiniai desertai kūdikiams, Kūdikių vaisiniai desertai
nl: Baby-vruchtentoetjes, Baby-vruchtentoetje
pt: Sobremesas de fruta para bebé
ro: Deserturi cu fructe pentru bebeluși, Deserturi cu fructe bebeluși